Hawaii statutes.
§432D-23 Required provisions and benefits. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, each policy, contract, plan, or agreement
issued in the State after January 1, 1995, by health maintenance organizations
pursuant to this chapter, shall include benefits provided in sections
431:10-212, 431:10A-115, 431:10A-115.5, 431:10A-116, 431:10A-116.2,
431:10A-116.5, 431:10A-116.6, 431:10A-119, 431:10A-120, 431:10A-121,
431:10A-122, 431:10A-125, 431:10A-126, 431:10A-132, 431:10A-133, 431:10A-140, and
431:10A-134, and chapter 431M. [L 1995, c 179, pt of §1; am L 1999, c 77, §8
and c 86, §4; am L 2000, c 243, §4; am L 2009, c 168, §3 and c 169, §8; am L
2010, c 157, §3; am L 2012, c 92, §4; am L 2015, c 197, §3, c 213, §5, and c
235, §5; am L 2016, c 204, §4]

Note

Applicability of 2016 amendment. L 2016, c 204, §§6, 8.

Attorney General Opinions

No reference was made to new section added to article 10A of
chapter 431 [§431:10A-601], by §4 of reciprocal beneficiaries act [L 1997, c
383]; thus, §431:10A-601 did not apply to health maintenance organizations.
Att. Gen. Op. 97-5.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next